Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-302
Homicide; terms, defined.

As used in sections 28-302 to 28-306, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Homicide shall mean the killing of a person by another;

(2) Person, when referring to the victim of a homicide, shall mean a human being who had been born and was alive at the time of the homicidal act; and

(3) Premeditation shall mean a design formed to do something before it is done.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 17.

Pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, evidence of premeditation is sufficient to uphold conviction for first degree murder when it demonstrates that the defendant told others that he wanted to "go finish (the victim) off", that the defendant broke off a knife attack on the victim to evade detection by a passing car, and that the defendant resumed the knife attack once the car had passed and the defendant heard the victim making noises which indicated that the victim was still alive. State v. Larsen, 255 Neb. 532, 586 N.W.2d 641 (1998).